Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1143YH (6) 91 nls/ko H.F. 58 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.37 Eating disorders ââ 1 coverage. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âCost-sharingâ means any coverage limit, copayment, 5 coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket expense 6 obligation imposed on a covered person by a policy, contract, 7 or plan providing for third-party payment or prepayment of 8 health or medical expenses. 9 b. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, or 10 other person participating in a policy, contract, or plan that 11 provides for third-party payment or prepayment of health or 12 medical expenses. 13 c. âEating disorderâ means pica, rumination disorder, 14 avoidant or restrictive food intake disorder, anorexia nervosa, 15 bulimia nervosa, binge eating disorder, other specified feeding 16 or eating disorder, and any other eating disorder contained 17 in the most recent edition of the diagnostic and statistical 18 manual of mental disorders as published by the American 19 psychiatric association. 20 d. âFacilityâ means an institution providing health care 21 services or a health care setting, including but not limited 22 to hospitals and other licensed inpatient centers, ambulatory 23 surgical or treatment centers, skilled nursing centers, 24 residential treatment centers, diagnostic centers, laboratory 25 and imaging centers, rehabilitation centers, and other 26 therapeutic settings. 27 e. âHealth care professionalâ means a physician, a 28 psychologist, a psychiatrist, a dietitian, or other health care 29 practitioner licensed, accredited, registered, or certified to 30 perform specified health care services consistent with state 31 law. 32 f. âHealth care providerâ means a health care professional 33 or a facility. 34 g. âHealth care servicesâ means services for the diagnosis, 35 -1- LSB 1143YH (6) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 58 prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition, 1 illness, injury, or disease including services for mental 2 health conditions, illnesses, injuries, or diseases. âHealth 3 care servicesâ also includes dental care services. 4 h. âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 5 514J.102. 6 i. âTreatment planâ means a plan for the treatment of 7 a covered personâs eating disorder developed by a health 8 care professional pursuant to a comprehensive evaluation 9 or reevaluation performed in consultation with the covered 10 person or the covered personâs representative. The plan may 11 include but is not limited to cognitive behavioral therapy, 12 family-based therapy, group cognitive behavioral therapy, 13 medical nutrition therapy, prescription drugs, hospitalization, 14 day treatment programs, residential treatment programs, and 15 other health care services. 16 2. a. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment 17 requirements of section 514C.6, a health carrier that offers 18 individual, group, or small group contracts, policies, or 19 plans in this state that provide for third-party payment or 20 prepayment of health or medical expenses shall offer coverage 21 for the treatment of eating disorders including all of the 22 following: 23 (1) Health care services pursuant to a covered personâs 24 treatment plan. 25 (2) Health care services pursuant to a covered personâs 26 treatment plan that are provided to the covered person 27 out-of-network or out-of-state if such health care services are 28 unavailable in this state and are determined to be medically 29 necessary by the covered personâs health care provider. 30 b. Coverage required under this section shall not be less 31 favorable than coverage a health carrier offers for general 32 physical illness. 33 c. Cost-sharing requirements imposed for coverage 34 required under this section shall not be less favorable than 35 -2- LSB 1143YH (6) 91 nls/ko 2/ 4 H.F. 58 cost-sharing requirements imposed by a health carrier for 1 general physical illness. 2 3. a. This section applies to the following classes of 3 third-party payment provider contracts, policies, or plans 4 delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this 5 state on or after January 1, 2026: 6 (1) Individual or group accident and sickness insurance 7 providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis. 8 (2) An individual or group hospital or medical service 9 contract issued pursuant to chapter 509, 514, or 514A. 10 (3) An individual or group health maintenance organization 11 contract regulated under chapter 514B. 12 (4) A plan established for public employees pursuant to 13 chapter 509A. 14 (5) The medical assistance program under chapter 249A 15 including all managed care organizations acting pursuant to a 16 contract with the department of health and human services to 17 administer the medical assistance program. 18 b. This section shall not apply to accident-only, 19 specified disease, short-term hospital or medical, hospital 20 confinement indemnity, credit, dental, vision, Medicare 21 supplement, long-term care, basic hospital and medical-surgical 22 expense coverage as defined by the commissioner, disability 23 income insurance coverage, coverage issued as a supplement 24 to liability insurance, workersâ compensation or similar 25 insurance, or automobile medical payment insurance. 26 4. The commissioner of insurance shall adopt rules pursuant 27 to chapter 17A to administer this section. 28